Wyoming, session 2025, SF0106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-16-117(b), (d) and by creating new
subsections (f) through (t) is amended to read:
31-16-117. Payment for delivery preparation,
warranty, sales incentives and service incentives.
(b) No schedule of compensation shall fail to include
reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, repair service
and labor. Time allowances for the diagnosis and
performance of warranty work and service shall be
reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed. The
hourly labor rate charged by the dealer for warranty
service shall not exceed the hourly labor rate charged to
nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty service and repairs,
provided that rate is reasonable and complies with the
requirements of this section. Reimbursement for parts
purchased by the dealer for use in performing work pursuant
to a manufacturer's express warranty shall be dealer cost
plus thirty percent (30%) the dealer's retail parts markup
rate, provided that rate is reasonable and complies with
the requirements of this section.
(d) All claims made by new vehicle dealers for
predelivery preparation, warranty, sales incentives or
service incentives shall be paid or credited within thirty
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(30) days following their approval. The manufacturer may
audit claims and charge the dealer for unsubstantiated or
incorrect claims for a period of one (1) year following
payment except where the manufacturer reasonably suspects
fraud. A manufacturer that reasonably suspects fraud may
audit claims for a period of four (4) years and charge the
dealer for fraudulent claims as otherwise provided by law.
All claims shall be either approved or disapproved within
thirty (30) days after their receipt, on forms or by
computerized communication and in the manner specified by
the manufacturer including a computerized communications
system. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing
or through electronic communication within thirty (30) days
after receipt is construed to be approved and payment shall
be made within thirty (30) days. A dealer whose claim has
been denied for failing to comply with a specific claim
processing requirement, including a clerical error or other
administrative technicality that does not question the
legitimacy of the claim, may resubmit the corrected claim
in accordance with this subsection.
(f) A new vehicle dealer may establish an hourly
labor rate or a retail parts markup rate charged for
warranty repairs to be included in the manufacturer's
schedule of compensation by mutual agreement with the
manufacturer or by submitting to the manufacturer, in
accordance with the manufacturer's reasonable procedures,
the following:
(i) The consecutive repair orders charged to
nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty service and repairs
made within one hundred eighty (180) days before the dealer
made its submission under this subsection that includes one
hundred (100) sequential repair orders reflecting qualified
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
repairs or all repair orders closed during any period of
ninety (90) consecutive days, whichever is less; and
(ii) The dealer's proposed hourly labor rate or
retail parts markup rate based on the repair orders
submitted under paragraph (i) of this subsection and as
calculated under subsections (h) through (k) of this
section.
(g) A new vehicle dealer shall not establish an
hourly labor rate, a retail parts markup rate or both under
subsection (f) of this section more than one (1) time every
twelve (12) months unless the rate is established by mutual
agreement with the manufacturer. Any rate established under
this section shall remain in the manufacturer's schedule of
compensation until changed in accordance with this section.
(h) A new vehicle dealer's hourly labor rate shall be
calculated by dividing the total amount charged for labor
for the qualified repair orders submitted pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section by the total number of hours
worked for the qualified repair orders.
(j) A new vehicle dealer's retail parts markup rate
shall be a percentage amount calculated by dividing the
total amount charged for the parts in the qualified repair
orders submitted pursuant to subsection (f) of this section
by the total cost of the purchase of the parts, subtracting
one (1) from that amount and multiplying by one hundred
(100).
(k) The following work shall not be included in the
calculation of a new vehicle dealer's hourly labor rate or
retail parts markup rate:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Repairs that are the subject of a
manufacturer's discounts including special events,
specials, promotions, coupons and service campaigns;
(ii) Repairs of vehicles owned by the dealer;
(iii) Routine maintenance, including but not
limited to routine replacements of fluids, filters,
batteries, bulbs, belts, nuts, bolts or fasteners;
(iv) Installations of accessories;
(v) Vehicle reconditioning;
(vi) Safety or emission inspections as required
by federal or state law;
(vii) Repairs caused by collision, road hazard,
force of elements, vandalism, theft or operator negligence;
(viii) Parts that do not have individual part
numbers;
(ix) Internal and dealership employee service
and repair orders;
(x) Repair orders where labor is performed by a
third party facility.
(m) Not later than thirty (30) days from receipt of
the new vehicle dealer's submission under subsection (f) of
this section, a new vehicle manufacturer may request that
the dealer submit additional repair orders if the
manufacturer determines from any set of repair orders
submitted under paragraph (f)(i) of this section that the
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
dealer's submitted rate is substantially higher or lower
than the rate currently on record in the manufacturer's
schedule of compensation. The additional repair orders
submitted under this subsection shall be for a period of
thirty (30) days before or thirty (30) days after the
period of time that the original repair orders were
submitted under paragraph (f)(i) of this section. A dealer
shall submit the additional repair orders requested under
this subsection not later than thirty (30) days after
receipt of the request. No manufacturer shall request
additional repair orders under this subsection more than
one (1) time per a dealer's submission under subsection (f)
of this section.
(n) A new vehicle manufacturer may contest a new
vehicle dealer's submitted rate by providing written notice
to the dealer not later than thirty (30) days after receipt
of the dealer's submission under subsection (f) or (m) of
this section. The manufacturer shall not modify its notice
under this subsection including the grounds for contesting
the submitted rate after the manufacturer sends its notice
to the dealer. The notice under this subsection shall:
(i) Explain the reasons why the dealer's
submitted rate is materially incomplete, materially
inaccurate or materially unreasonable;
(ii) Provide evidence to substantiate why the
submitted rate is materially incomplete, materially
inaccurate or materially unreasonable;
(iii) Propose an adjustment to the submitted
rate.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(o) If a new vehicle manufacturer does not request
additional repair orders under subsection (m) of this
section or contest the new vehicle dealer's submitted rate
under subsection (n) of this section then the dealer's
submitted rate shall become effective and shall be included
in the manufacturer's schedule of compensation forty-five
(45) days after the manufacturer receives the dealer's
submission under subsection (f) or (m) of this section.
(p) If a new vehicle manufacturer contests a new
vehicle dealer's submitted rate under subsection (n) of
this section then the manufacturer and the dealer shall
participate in mediation. The mediation process shall
terminate after sixty (60) days unless extended by
unanimous mutual agreement.
(q) Upon the expiration of the mediation period under
subsection (p) of this section, a new vehicle dealer may
file a civil cause of action in any court of competent
jurisdiction not later than sixty (60) days after the
expiration of the mediation period. In a civil action
brought under this subsection, the new vehicle manufacturer
shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the
evidence that the dealer's submitted rate was materially
incomplete, materially inaccurate or materially
unreasonable.
(r) This section shall not apply to:
(i) Electric vehicle propulsion batteries
provided to the new vehicle dealer at no cost, provided
that the new vehicle manufacturer pays a reasonable
handling fee to the dealer;
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Complete engine and transmission assemblies
replaced under warranty or other new vehicle manufacturer
reimbursed repairs. For these assemblies, the manufacturer
shall reimburse the new vehicle dealer for the dealer's
costs for the parts purchased by the dealer for use in
performing the work pursuant to the manufacturer's express
warranty plus forty percent (40%).
(s) If a new vehicle manufacturer provided a part to
a new vehicle dealer at no cost to perform repairs under a
manufacturer campaign, service action or warranty repair,
the manufacturer shall provide to the dealer an amount
equal to the retail parts markup for that part. The retail
parts markup under this subsection shall be calculated by
multiplying the dealer's cost for the part as listed in the
manufacturer's price schedule by the retail parts markup
rate established under this section.
(t) As used in this section:
(i) "Mediation" means the act of a neutral
person in intermediating between or among contending
parties with a view of assisting them to adjust or settle
their dispute by mutual agreement;
(ii) "Parts" means parts, accessories,
equipment, components, systems and functions including rear
axle assemblies and replacements of parts, accessories,
equipment, components, systems and functions;
(iii) "Qualified repair" means a repair to a
motor vehicle that would have been included within the new
vehicle manufacturer's new motor vehicle warranty if:
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(A) The motor vehicle that is being
repaired had not exceeded the time or mileage limit, or
both, of the warranty;
(B) The repair does not constitute a repair
that is covered by the warranty; and
(C) The repair does not include any of the
work described in W.S. 31-16-117(k).
(iv) "Qualified repair order" means a repair
order that encompasses, in whole or in part, at least one
(1) qualified repair;
(v) "Repair order" means an accounting copy of
an invoice issued to a retail customer that is closed as of
the time of submission that evidences at least one (1)
repair on a motor vehicle. A "repair order" shall include:
(A) For a retail parts markup rate
submission, the cost of each part and the part's sale price
including parts sold or used and the total amount charged
to the customer;
(B) For an hourly labor rate submission,
the number of labor hours charged for each repair, the sale
price for the labor and the total amount charged to the
customer.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
9